Utah statutes.
76-10-508.1.   Felony discharge of a firearm -- Penalties.
(1)  Except as provided under Subsection (2) or (3), a person who discharges a
firearm is guilty of a third degree felony punishable by imprisonment for a
term of not less than three years nor more than five years if:
(a)  the actor discharges a firearm in the direction of any person or persons,
knowing or having reason to believe that any person may be endangered by the
discharge of the firearm;
(b)  the actor, with intent to intimidate or harass another or with intent to
damage a habitable structure as defined in Section 76-6-101, discharges a
firearm in the direction of any person or habitable structure; or
(c)  the actor, with intent to intimidate or harass another, discharges a
firearm in the direction of any vehicle.
(2)  A violation of Subsection (1) which causes bodily injury to any person is
a second degree felony punishable by imprisonment for a term of not less than
three years nor more than 15 years.
(3)  A violation of Subsection (1) which causes serious bodily injury to any
person is a first degree felony.
(4)  In addition to any other penalties for a violation of this section, the
court shall:
(a)  notify the Driver License Division of the conviction for purposes of any
revocation, denial, suspension, or disqualification of a driver license under
Subsection 53-3-220(1)(a)(xi); and
(b)  specify in court at the time of sentencing the length of the revocation
under Subsection 53-3-225(1)(c).
(5)  This section does not apply to a person:
(a)  who discharges any kind of firearm when that person is in lawful defense
of self or others;
(b)  who is performing official duties as provided in Section 23-20-1.5 or
76-10-523 or as otherwise authorized by law; or
(c)  who discharges a dangerous weapon or firearm from an automobile or other
vehicle, if:
(i)  the discharge occurs at a firing range or training ground;
(ii)  at no time after the discharge does the projectile that is discharged
cross over or stop at a location other than within the boundaries of the
firing range or training ground described in Subsection (5)(c)(i);
(iii)  the discharge is made as practice or training for a lawful purpose;
(iv)  the discharge and the location, time, and manner of the discharge are
approved by the owner or operator of the firing range or training ground prior
to the discharge; and
(v)  the discharge is not made in violation of Subsection (1).
